Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.165

National guard high school career training and national guard youth challenge program—Rules.

(1) In addition to any other powers and duties as provided by law, the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the military department, shall adopt rules governing and authorizing the acceptance of national guard high school career training and the national guard youth challenge program in lieu of either required high school credits or elective high school credits.

(2) With the exception of students enrolled in the national guard youth challenge program, students enrolled in such national guard programs shall be considered enrolled in the common school last attended preceding enrollment in such national guard program.

(3) The superintendent shall adopt rules to ensure that students who successfully complete the national guard youth challenge program are granted an appropriate number of high school credits, based on the students' levels of academic proficiency as measured by the program.

[ 2006 c 263 s 406; 2002 c 291 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 262 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.305.170, 28A.04.133.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.